el: Ζώνη υπολειπόμενης βελόνας: Παγκόσμια; Ζώνη 1; Ζώνη 2; Ζώνη 3; Ζώνη 4; Ζώνη 5; Άλλο
pt-BR: Agulha zona de equilíbrio: Global; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Outro
cs: Jehlová zóna: Globální; Zóna 1; Zóna 2; Zóna 3; Zóna 4; Zóna 5; Ostatní
lt-LT: Adatos balansavimo zona: Pasaulinis; 1 zona; 2 zona; 3 zona; 4 zona; 5 zona; Kita
de: Ausgleichszone der Kompassnadel: Global; Zone 1; Zone 2; Zone 3; Zone 4; Zone 5; Sonstiges
ko: 나침반 바늘 밸런스 구역: 글로벌; 존 1; 존 2; 존 3; 존 4; 존 5; 기타
tr: Pusula iğnesi denge bölgesi: Küresel; Bölge 1; Bölge 2; Bölge 3; Bölge 4; Bölge 5; Diğer
zh-TW: 指南針指針平衡區: 全球; 區域 1; 區域 2; 區域 3; 區域 4; 區域 5; 其他
sv: Nålens balanszon: Global; Zon 1; Zon 2; Zon 3; Zon 4; Zon 5; Övrigt
fr: Zone d’équilibrage de l’aiguille: Globale; Zone 1; Zone 2; Zone 3; Zone 4; Zone 5; Autre
it: Zona di bilanciamento dell'ago: Globale; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Altro
nl: Naald balanszone: Globaal; Zone 1; Zone 2; Zone 3; Zone 4; Zone 5; Anders
sl-SI: Območje uravnoteženosti igle: Globalno; Cona 1; Cona 2; Cona 3; Cona 4; Cona 5; Drugo
ro-RO: Zona de echilibrare a acului: Global; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Altele
hu: Tű egyensúlyi zónája: Globális; 1. zóna; 2. zóna; 3. zóna; 4. zóna; 5. zóna; Egyéb
bg-BG: Зона на балансиране на иглата: Глобална; Зона 1; Зона 2; Зона 3; Зона 4; Зона 5; Друго
ru: Зона балансировки стрелки: Глобальная; Зона 1; Зона 2; Зона 3; Зона 4; Зона 5; Другая
ja: 針バランスゾーン: グローバル; ゾーン1; ゾーン2; ゾーン3; ゾーン4; ゾーン5; その他
en: Needle balance zone: Global; Zone 1; Zone 2; Zone 3; Zone 4; Zone 5; Other
sk-SK: Zóna vyváženia ihly: Globálna; Zóna 1; Zóna 2; Zóna 3; Zóna 4; Zóna 5; Iné
vi: Vùng cân bằng kim: Toàn cầu; Vùng 1; Vùng 2; Vùng 3; Vùng 4; Vùng 5; Khác
nb: Nålens balanseområde: Global; Sone 1; Sone 2; Sone 3; Sone 4; Sone 5; Annet
zh-CN: 针平衡区: 全局; 区域 1; 区域 2; 区域 3; 区域 4; 区域 5; 其他
es: Zona de equilibrio de la aguja: Global; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Otro
pl: Strefa wyważenia igły: Globalna; Strefa 1; Strefa 2; Strefa 3; Strefa 4; Strefa 5; Inne
hr-HR: Zona ravnoteže igle: Globalno; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Ostalo
pt-PT: Zona de saldo de agulhas: Global; Zona 1; Zona 2; Zona 3; Zona 4; Zona 5; Outro
da: Balancezone for kompasnål: Global; Zone 1; Zone 2; Zone 3; Zone 4; Zone 5; Andet
fi: Neulan tasapainotusalue: Yleinen; Vyöhyke 1; Vyöhyke 2; Vyöhyke 3; Vyöhyke 4; Vyöhyke 5; Muu
th: โซนสมดุลของเข็มทิศ: ทั่วโลก; โซน1; โซน2; โซน3; โซน4; โซน5; อื่นๆ